Hawaii statutes.
PART X.
SPEED RESTRICTIONS

Cross References

Neighborhood electric vehicle requirements, see §291C-134.

§291C-101 Basic rule. No person shall
drive a vehicle at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent and having
regard to the actual and potential hazards and conditions then existing.
Consistent with the foregoing, every person shall drive at a safe and
appropriate speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railroad
grade crossing, when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a
hill crest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway, and when special
hazards exist with respect to pedestrians or other traffic, or by reason of
weather or highway conditions. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am L 1977, c 8, §1]

Case Notes

For conviction, there must be evidence that the speed was
unreasonable under the actual and potential hazards and conditions then
existing. 1 H. App. 403, 619 P.2d 1102.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next